Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Article 17. Substance-Exposed Infants.

§ 32.1-73.12.
Department to be lead agency for services for substance-exposed infants.

The Department shall serve as the lead agency with responsibility for the development, coordination, and implementation of a plan for services for substance-exposed infants in the Commonwealth. Such plan shall support a trauma-informed approach to identification and treatment of substance-exposed infants and their caregivers and shall include options for improving screening and identification of substance-using pregnant women; use of multidisciplinary approaches to intervention and service delivery during the prenatal period and following the birth of the substance-exposed child; and referral among providers serving substance-exposed infants and their families and caregivers. In carrying out its duties, the Department shall work cooperatively with the Department of Social Services, the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services, community services boards and behavioral health authorities, local departments of health, the Virginia Chapter of the American Academy of Pediatrics, the American Congress of Obstetricians and Gynecologists, Virginia Section, and such other stakeholders as may be appropriate. The Department shall report annually on December 1 to the General Assembly regarding implementation of the plan.

History.

2018, cc. 695, 696.

Law Review.

For essay, “Virginia Ranks Forty-Ninth of Fifty: The Need for Stronger Laws Supporting Foster Youth,” see 53 U. Rich. L. Rev. 255 (2018).